Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOORHEAD CULTURAL MALL.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Immigrant Development Center, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to preserve and enhance the arts and cultural heritage of diverse Minnesota communities by establishing a cultural mall in the city of Moorhead. The grant may be used to acquire, renovate, and upgrade a property for this purpose. new text end